pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de pás de mistura: Acessórios de aerógrafo; Soluções de limpeza de trinchas/pincéis; Acessórios de rolo de pintura
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Anstreichzubehör: Airbrushzubehör; Pinselreiniger; Anstreichrollenzubehör
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за инструменти за боядисване: Аксесоари за аерограф; Почистващи средства за бояджийски четки; Аксесоари за валяци за боядисване
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till målarverktyg: Tillbehör till sprutpistoler; Rengöring av färgpenslar; Tillbehör till rollers
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para herramientas de pintura: Accesorios para pintura con aerógrafo; Soluciones de limpieza para brochas; Accesorios para rodillos de pintura
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện dụng cụ sơn: Phụ kiện súng phun sơn; Dung dịch làm sạch chổi sơn; Phụ kiện con lăn sơn
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือสำหรับสี: อุปกรณ์แปรงพ่นสี; น้ำยาล้างแปรงทาสี; อุปกรณ์ลูกกลิ้งสี
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre lakovacie nástroje: Príslušenstvo pre rozprašovače; Roztoky na čistenie štetcov; Príslušenstvo k maliarskym valčekom
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Boya Aleti Aksesuarları: Boya Tabancası Aksesuarları; Boya Fırçası Temizleme Solüsyonları; Boya Rulosu Aksesuarları
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων βαφής: Αξεσουάρ αερογράφων; Καθαριστικά για πινέλα βαφής; Αξεσουάρ ρολών βαφής
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k malířskému náčiní: Příslušenství ke stříkacím pistolím; Čisticí roztoky na malířské štětce; Příslušenství k malířským válečkům
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per verniciatura: Accessori per spruzzatori; Soluzioni per la pulizia dei pennelli; Accessori per rulli da verniciatura
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Maalipensselin lisätarvikkeet: Airbrush-ruiskun lisätarvikkeet; Maalipensselin puhdistus; Maalaustelan lisätarvikkeet
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour outils de peinture: Accessoires pour aérographes; Nettoyants pour pinceaux; Accessoires pour rouleaux à peinture
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Accessoires voor verfgereedschappen: Accessoires voor spuitpistolen; Verfkwastreinigers; Accessoires voor verfrollers
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 油漆工具配件: 噴筆配件; 漆刷清潔用品; 油漆滾筒配件
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Paint Tool Accessories: Airbrush Accessories; Paint Brush Cleaning Solutions; Paint Roller Accessories
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør til malingsverktøy: Airbrushtilbehør; Rengjøringsløsninger for malepensler; Tilbehør til malingsruller
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Festőszerszám-kiegészítők: Festékszórópisztoly-kiegészítők; Ecsettisztító megoldások; Festőhenger-kiegészítők
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > 塗装工具関連用品: エアブラシ用関連用品; 塗装ブラシ用洗浄剤; ペイントローラー関連用品
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru unelte pentru zugrăvit: Accesorii pentru aerograf; Soluții pentru curățarea pensulelor; Accesorii pentru trafaleți
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za alat za bojanje: Dodaci za pištolje za raspršivanje boje; Otopine za čišćenje kistova; Pribor za valjke za bojanje
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do narzędzi malarskich: Akcesoria do aerografów; Produkty do czyszczenia pędzli; Akcesoria do wałków malarskich
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 油漆工具配件: 喷枪配件; 油漆刷清洁溶液; 滚漆筒配件
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para ferramentas de pintura: Acessórios para aerógrafos; Soluções de limpeza para pincéis; Acessórios para rolos de pintura
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Maleværktøj – tilbehør: Sprøjtepensel – tilbehør; Rengøringsmidler til malerpensler; Malerulle – tilbehør
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для малярных инструментов: Аксессуары для аэрографов; Растворы для очистки малярных кистей; Аксессуары для малярных валиков
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Dažymo įrankių priedai: Dažų purkštuvų priedai; Dažymo teptukų valikliai; Dažų volelių priedai
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za orodje za barvanje: Dodatki za brizgalne pištole; Raztopine za čiščenje čopičev; Dodatki za valjčke za barvanje
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 페인트 도구 부대용품: 에어브러시 부대용품; 그림 붓 세척제; 페인트 롤러 부대용품